Utah statutes.
30-1-2.2.   Validation of interracial marriages.

All interracial marriages, otherwise valid and legal, contracted prior to July 1, 1965, to which one of the parties of the marriage was subject to disability to marry on account of Subsection 30-1-2(5) or (6), as those subsections existed prior to May 14, 1963, are hereby valid and made lawful in all respects as though such marriages had been duly and legally contracted in the first instance.



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session

